Georgia, session 2025_26, SB313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 36-74-30 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to other
enforcement methods and probable cause for investigation required, is amended by revising
subsection (b) as follows:
"(b) No local government is authorized to perform investigations or inspections of
residential rental property unless there is probable cause to believe there is or has been a
violation or violations of applicable codes, and in no event may a local government require
the registration of residential rental property. Conditions which appear to be code
violations which are in plain view may form the basis for probable cause.
S. B. 313
- 1 -

LC 62 0086
(b)(1) With adequate notice to the owner, a local government is authorized to perform
investigations or inspections of residential rental property containing four or more
dwelling units when there is a reasonable suspicion to believe there is or has been a
violation or violations of applicable codes. Conditions which appear to be code
violations and are in plain view may form the basis for a reasonable suspicion.
(2) A local government may require the registration of residential rental property owned
directly or indirectly by any person or entity that owns at least 20 residential rental
properties in Georgia."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 313
- 2 -